Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2576XS (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. 237 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION ââ WORKING GROUP ââ 1 IMPACT OF TECHNOLOGY ON COGNITIVE LEARNING. 2 1. The department of education, in collaboration with the 3 department of health and human services, shall convene and 4 provide administrative support to a working group that shall 5 examine research related to the impact of school-provided 6 technology on the cognitive function and academic performance 7 of students. For purposes of this section, âschool-provided 8 technologyâ includes laptop computers, online learning 9 management systems, and classroom slide show presentations. 10 2. Any expenses incurred by a member of the working group 11 shall be the responsibility of the individual member or the 12 respective entity represented by the member. 13 3. The working group shall submit its findings and 14 recommendations in a report to the general assembly by December 15 31, 2025. The report shall include recommendations on best 16 practices related to the use of school-provided technology in 17 educational contexts with a focus on ways to mitigate possible 18 negative impacts on the social and behavioral development, 19 attention span, mental concentration, and learning ability of 20 students. 21